Connecticut, session 2026, SB00300.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 52-352b of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
The following property of any natural person shall be exempt:
(1) Necessary apparel, bedding, foodstuffs, household furniture and
appliances;
(2) Tools, books, instruments, farm animals and livestock feed, which
are necessary to the exemptioner in the course of his or her occupation,
profession or farming operation;
(3) Burial plot for the exemptioner and his or her immediate family;
(4) Public assistance payments and any wages earned by a public
assistance recipient under an incentive earnings or similar program;
(5) Health and disability insurance payments;
(6) Health aids necessary to enable the exemptioner to work or to
sustain health;
LCO 1 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 300
(7) Workers' compensation, Social Security, veterans and
unemployment benefits;
(8) Court-approved payments for child support;
(9) Arms and military equipment, uniforms or musical instruments
owned by any member of the militia or armed forces of the United
States;
(10) Up to two motor vehicles to the value of seven thousand dollars
in the aggregate, provided value shall be determined as the fair market
value of the motor vehicles less the amount of all liens and security
interests which encumber them;
(11) Wedding and engagement rings;
(12) Residential utility deposits for one residence, and one residential
security deposit;
(13) Any assets or interests of an exemptioner in, or payments
received by the exemptioner from, a plan or arrangement described in
section 52-321a;
(14) Alimony and support, other than child support, but only to the
extent that wages are exempt from execution under section 52-361a;
(15) An award under a crime reparations act;
(16) All benefits allowed by any association of persons in this state
towards the support of any of its members incapacitated by sickness or
infirmity from attending to his usual business;
(17) All moneys due the exemptioner from any insurance company
on any insurance policy issued on exempt property, to the same extent
that the property was exempt;
(18) Any interest of the exemptioner in any property not to exceed in
value one thousand dollars;
LCO 2 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 300
(19) Any interest of the exemptioner not to exceed in value four
thousand dollars in any accrued dividend or interest under, or loan
value of, any unmatured life insurance contract owned by the
exemptioner under which the insured is the exemptioner or an
individual of whom the exemptioner is a dependent;
(20) The cash surrender value of any life insurance policy issued upon
the life of a citizen or resident of this state, unless the life insurance
policy was assigned to or was effected for the benefit of the creditor or
unless the purchase, sale, or transfer of the life insurance policy is made
with the intent to defraud the creditor;
(21) The homestead of the exemptioner to the value of two hundred
fifty thousand dollars, provided value shall be determined as the fair
market value of the real property less the amount of any statutory or
consensual lien which encumbers it, except that, in the case of a money
judgment arising out of a claim of sexual abuse or exploitation of a
minor, sexual assault or other wilful, wanton, or reckless misconduct
committed by a natural person, to the value of seventy-five thousand
dollars; [and]
(22) Irrevocable transfers of money to an account held by a debt
adjuster licensed pursuant to sections 36a-655 to 36a-665, inclusive, for
the benefit of creditors of the exemptioner; and
(23) Any part of the balance of an account deemed a joint account
under section 36a-290 in which the exemptioner has no equitable
ownership interest and that was deposited in the account or acquired by
a joint account holder other than the exemptioner for such joint account
holder's sole benefit.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 52-352b
BA Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 3 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 300
LCO 4 of 4